Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF400.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62J.26, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Sources of funding. (a) The commissioner shall not use any funds for purposes of deleted text begin this sectiondeleted text end new text begin subdivisions 1 to 3new text end other than as provided in this subdivision or as specified in an appropriation. (b) The commissioner may seek and accept funding from sources other than the state to pay for evaluations under this section to supplement or replace state appropriations. Any money received under this paragraph must be deposited in the state treasury, credited to a separate account for this purpose in the special revenue fund, and is appropriated to the commissioner for purposes of this section. (c) If an evaluation is required under this section, the commissioner may use for purposes of the evaluation: (1) any funds appropriated to the commissioner specifically for purposes of this section; or (2) funds available under paragraph (b), if use of the funds for evaluation of that mandated health benefit proposal is consistent with any restrictions imposed by the source of the funds. (d) The commissioner must ensure that the source of the funding has no influence on the process or outcome of the evaluation. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62J.26, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Defrayal of cost. new text end new text begin If an evaluation of a mandated health benefit proposal projects that the proposal results in a net increase in per-member, per-month costs for the total nonpublic insured population and the proposal is enacted into law, the commissioner must make payments to health plan companies to defray the cost of the mandated health benefit proposal on the products offered by the companies in the individual, small group, and large group markets. The commissioner must make a payment to a health plan company under this subdivision within 60 days of the date the commissioner receives a statement from the health plan company. The existing process under Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 155.170, to defray the cost and ensure quantifiable cost calculation meets the requirements of this subdivision. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, and applies to all mandated health benefit proposals passed into law after that date. new text end